Maine, session 132, LD834.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3273, sub-§1, as amended by PL 1985, c. 770, §3, is further
amended to read:
1. Combined benefits. The department shall take action, as necessary, to assure
ensure that, within the limits of available funds, a state supplemental income benefit, when
combined with a federal supplemental security income benefit, shall consist consists of
such amounts that the sum shall must:
A. Increase the minimum monthly federal payment standard, in addition to that
established pursuant to federal law, by an amount of at least $8 $65 per month for an
individual and $12 per month for an amount per couple that is consistent with the
amount provided to an individual pursuant to this paragraph and to a couple under
section 3271, subsection 2;
A-1. Annually, beginning October 1, 2026, increase the minimum monthly federal
payment standard, in addition to that established pursuant to federal law, by an amount
at least equal to the amount in paragraph A multiplied by the cumulative percentage
effect on the federal payment standard of federal cost-of-living adjustments;
B. For an individual who resides in an adult foster home or boarding home, having a
contract with the department for the provision of services to eligible residents, or
nursing home, as defined in section 1812‑A, in addition to the benefits provided herein
under paragraphs A and C, provide sufficient income to allow the individual for
personal needs an amount equal to at least $30 a month 3 times the state supplemental
income benefit calculated pursuant to paragraphs A and A-1, plus an amount sufficient
to meet the monthly per resident payment rate as established by the department of the
adult foster home or boarding home in which the individual resides; and
C. For a beneficiary who resides in a living arrangement which that meets a living
arrangement classification established by the department, but who does not reside in
an adult foster home or boarding home, in addition to the minimum federal payment
level as adjusted pursuant to paragraph paragraphs A and A-1, provide, based on such
living arrangement classification, an amount not to exceed $42 per month for an
individual and $63 per month for an amount per couple that is consistent with the
amount provided to an individual pursuant to this paragraph and to a couple under
section 3271, subsection 2.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §3273, sub-§4, as amended by PL 1979, c. 563, §3, is further
amended to read:
4. Expenditures. Appropriations available for benefits provided in subsection 1 shall
must be budgeted and authorized for expenditure by the department in a priority sequence.
First, the available appropriation shall must be budgeted and expended to increase the
minimum monthly federal payment, as specified in subsection 1, paragraph A. Second, the
available appropriation must be budgeted and expended to increase the minimum monthly
federal payment, as specified in subsection 1, paragraph A-1. Third, any balance of the
appropriation remaining after such budgeting, shall must be budgeted and expended to
provide an individual sufficient income for personal needs, in accordance with subsection
1, paragraph B, and to meet the monthly per resident payment rate for adult foster and
boarding home care as provided in subsection 1, paragraph B and subsection 3. Finally,
Page 1 - 132LR1494(01)

415 any balance of the appropriations remaining after such budgeting shall must be budgeted
426 and expended to provide benefits related to variations by living arrangements as provided
437 in subsection 1, paragraph C.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §3273, sub-§6, ¶A, as enacted by PL 1973, c. 790, §3, is
amended to read:
A. It is the declared intent of this Act that, if it is proposed that benefits provided
pursuant to subsection 1 are to be increased on any future date, that such proposal shall
must recommend, and implementation of such increases shall must provide, that the
benefits pursuant to subsection 1, paragraph paragraphs A, A-1 and B, shall must be
increased, and the benefits pursuant to subsection 1, paragraph B, shall be increased,
rather than increasing benefits pursuant to subsection 1, paragraph C.
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §3274-A, as enacted by PL 1979, c. 563, §4, is amended to read:
§3274-A. Personal needs of nursing home residents
In administering this chapter, the department shall ensure that eligible individuals
residing in nursing homes, as defined in section 1812‑A, shall have at least $30 a month
for personal needs a monthly amount for personal needs equal to at least 3 times the amount
of the state supplemental income benefit calculated pursuant to section 3273, subsection 1,
paragraphs A and A-1.